Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-2,191
Court proceedings.

(MBCA 14.08) (a) A dissolved corporation that
has published a notice under section 21-2,190 may file an application with
the district court of the county where the dissolved corporation's principal
office, or, if none in this state, its registered office, is located for a
determination of the amount and form of security to be provided for payment
of claims that are contingent or have not been made known to the dissolved
corporation or that are based on an event occurring after the effective date
of dissolution but that, based on the facts known to the dissolved corporation,
are reasonably estimated to arise after the effective date of dissolution.
Provision need not be made for any claim that is or is reasonably anticipated
to be barred under subsection (c) of section 21-2,190.

(b) Within ten days after
the filing of the application, notice of the proceeding shall be given by
the dissolved corporation to each claimant holding a contingent claim whose
contingent claim is shown on the records of the dissolved corporation.

(c) The court may appoint
a guardian ad litem to represent all claimants whose identities are unknown
in any proceeding brought under this section. The reasonable fees and expenses
of such guardian, including all reasonable expert witness fees, shall be paid
by the dissolved corporation.

(d)
Provision by the dissolved corporation for security in the amount and the
form ordered by the court under subsection (a) of this section shall satisfy
the dissolved corporation's obligations with respect to claims that are contingent,
have not been made known to the dissolved corporation, or are based on an
event occurring after the effective date of dissolution, and such claims may
not be enforced against a shareholder who received assets in liquidation.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 191.